tests/хӑю.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Сӑмах хӑю":
    хӑю<n><nom> :  хӑю 
    хӑю<n><gen> :  хӑйӑвӑн 
    хӑю<n><dat> :  хӑйӑва 
    хӑю<n><loc> :  хӑюра 
    хӑю<n><abl> :  хӑюран 
    хӑю<n><ins> :  хӑюпа 
    хӑю<n><abe> :  хӑюсӑр 
    хӑю<n><ben> :  хӑюшӑн
    хӑю<n><px1sg><nom> :  хӑйӑвӑм 
    хӑю<n><px1sg><gen> :  хӑйӑвӑмӑн 
    хӑю<n><px1sg><dat> :  хӑйӑвӑма 
    хӑю<n><px1sg><loc> :  хӑйӑвӑмра 
    хӑю<n><px1sg><abl> :  хӑйӑвӑмран 
    хӑю<n><px1sg><ins> :  хӑйӑвӑмпа 
    хӑю<n><px1sg><abe> :  хӑйӑвӑмсӑр 
    хӑю<n><px1sg><ben> :  хӑйӑвӑмшӑн
    хӑю<n><px2sg><nom> :  хӑйӑву 
    хӑю<n><px2sg><gen> :  хӑйӑвун 
    хӑю<n><px2sg><dat> :  хӑйӑвна 
    хӑю<n><px2sg><loc> :  хӑйӑвунта
    хӑю<n><px2sg><abl> :  хӑйӑвунтан 
    хӑю<n><px2sg><ins> :  хӑйӑвупа 
    хӑю<n><px2sg><abe> :  хӑйӑвусӑр 
    хӑю<n><px2sg><ben> :  хӑйӑвушӑн
    хӑю<n><px3sp><nom> :  хӑйӑвӗ 
    хӑю<n><px3sp><gen> :  хӑйӑвӗн 
    хӑю<n><px3sp><dat> :  хӑйӑвне 
    хӑю<n><px3sp><loc> :  хӑйӑвӗнче 
    хӑю<n><px3sp><abl> :  хӑйӑвӗнчен 
    хӑю<n><px3sp><ins> :  хӑйӑвӗпе 
    хӑю<n><px3sp><abe> :  хӑйӑвӗсӗр 
    хӑю<n><px3sp><ben> :  хӑйӑвӗшӗн
    хӑю<n><px1pl><nom> :  хӑйӑвӑмӑр 
    хӑю<n><px1pl><gen> :  хӑйӑвӑмӑрӑн 
    хӑю<n><px1pl><dat> :  хӑйӑвӑмӑра 
    хӑю<n><px1pl><loc> :  хӑйӑвӑмӑрта 
    хӑю<n><px1pl><abl> :  хӑйӑвӑмӑртан 
    хӑю<n><px1pl><ins> :  хӑйӑвӑмӑрпа 
    хӑю<n><px1pl><abe> :  хӑйӑвӑмӑрсӑр 
    хӑю<n><px1pl><ben> :  хӑйӑвӑмӑршӑн
    хӑю<n><px2pl><nom> :  хӑйӑвӑр 
    хӑю<n><px2pl><gen> :  хӑйӑвӑрӑн 
    хӑю<n><px2pl><dat> :  хӑйӑвӑра 
    хӑю<n><px2pl><loc> :  хӑйӑвӑрта 
    хӑю<n><px2pl><abl> :  хӑйӑвӑртан 
    хӑю<n><px2pl><ins> :  хӑйӑвӑрпа 
    хӑю<n><px2pl><abe> :  хӑйӑвӑрсӑр 
    хӑю<n><px2pl><ben> :  хӑйӑвӑршӑн
    хӑю<n><pl><nom> :  хӑюсем 
    хӑю<n><pl><gen> :  хӑюсен 
    хӑю<n><pl><dat> :  хӑюсене 
    хӑю<n><pl><loc> :  хӑюсенче 
    хӑю<n><pl><abl> :  хӑюсенчен 
    хӑю<n><pl><ins> :  хӑюсемпе 
    хӑю<n><pl><abe> :  хӑюсемсӗр 
    хӑю<n><pl><ben> :  хӑюсемшӗн
    хӑю<n><px1sg><pl><nom> :  хӑйӑвӑмсем 
    хӑю<n><px1sg><pl><gen> :  хӑйӑвӑмсен 
    хӑю<n><px1sg><pl><dat> :  хӑйӑвӑмсене 
    хӑю<n><px1sg><pl><loc> :  хӑйӑвӑмсенче 
    хӑю<n><px1sg><pl><abl> :  хӑйӑвӑмсенчен 
    хӑю<n><px1sg><pl><ins> :  хӑйӑвӑмсемпе 
    хӑю<n><px1sg><pl><abe> :  хӑйӑвӑмсемсӗр 
    хӑю<n><px1sg><pl><ben> :  хӑйӑвӑмсемшӗн
    хӑю<n><px2sg><pl><nom> :  хӑйӑвусем 
    хӑю<n><px2sg><pl><gen> :  хӑйӑвусен 
    хӑю<n><px2sg><pl><dat> :  хӑйӑвусене 
    хӑю<n><px2sg><pl><loc> :  хӑйӑвусенче 
    хӑю<n><px2sg><pl><abl> :  хӑйӑвусенчен 
    хӑю<n><px2sg><pl><ins> :  хӑйӑвусемпе 
    хӑю<n><px2sg><pl><abe> :  хӑйӑвусемсӗр 
    хӑю<n><px2sg><pl><ben> :  хӑйӑвусемшӗн
    хӑю<n><px3sp><pl><nom> :  хӑйӑвӗсем 
    хӑю<n><px3sp><pl><gen> :  хӑйӑвӗсен 
    хӑю<n><px3sp><pl><dat> :  хӑйӑвӗсене 
    хӑю<n><px3sp><pl><loc> :  хӑйӑвӗсенче 
    хӑю<n><px3sp><pl><abl> :  хӑйӑвӗсенчен 
    хӑю<n><px3sp><pl><ins> :  хӑйӑвӗсемпе 
    хӑю<n><px3sp><pl><abe> :  хӑйӑвӗсемсӗр 
    хӑю<n><px3sp><pl><ben> :  хӑйӑвӗсемшӗн
    хӑю<n><px1pl><pl><nom> :  хӑйӑвӑмӑрсем 
    хӑю<n><px1pl><pl><gen> :  хӑйӑвӑмӑрсен 
    хӑю<n><px1pl><pl><dat> :  хӑйӑвӑмӑрсене 
    хӑю<n><px1pl><pl><loc> :  хӑйӑвӑмӑрсенче 
    хӑю<n><px1pl><pl><abl> :  хӑйӑвӑмӑрсенчен 
    хӑю<n><px1pl><pl><ins> :  хӑйӑвӑмӑрсемпе 
    хӑю<n><px1pl><pl><abe> :  хӑйӑвӑмӑрсемсӗр 
    хӑю<n><px1pl><pl><ben> :  хӑйӑвӑмӑрсемшӗн
    хӑю<n><px2pl><pl><nom> :  хӑйӑвӑрсем 
    хӑю<n><px2pl><pl><gen> :  хӑйӑвӑрсен 
    хӑю<n><px2pl><pl><dat> :  хӑйӑвӑрсене 
    хӑю<n><px2pl><pl><loc> :  хӑйӑвӑрсенче 
    хӑю<n><px2pl><pl><abl> :  хӑйӑвӑрсенчен 
    хӑю<n><px2pl><pl><ins> :  хӑйӑвӑрсемпе 
    хӑю<n><px2pl><pl><abe> :  хӑйӑвӑрсемсӗр 
    хӑю<n><px2pl><pl><ben> :  хӑйӑвӑрсемшӗн
